Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Computation, corporations. new text begin (a) new text end The franchise tax imposed upon corporations shall be computed by applying to their taxable income the rate of 9.8 percentnew text begin , reduced by all prior adjustments made under paragraph (b)new text end . new text begin (b) The commissioner must adjust the rate under paragraph (a) by reducing the rate by 0.312 percent each time either of the following occur: new text end new text begin (1) if the amount of a budget surplus equals or exceeds the amount of net adjusted revenue reduction; and new text end new text begin (2) if the most recent tax incidence report submitted to the legislature under section 270C.13 allocates over 70 percent of the corporate franchise tax to consumers. new text end new text begin (c) In no case may the commissioner adjust the rate pursuant to paragraph (b) below 8.24 percent. The commissioner must publish notice of a rate reduction by December 31. The adjusted rate is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31 of the calendar year in which the notice is published. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "budget surplus" means, for the calendar year in which the commissioner is required to publish notice of a rate reduction under paragraph (b), the amount of a positive unrestricted general fund balance remaining after any transfer is made to the budget reserve account as required under section 16A.152, subdivision 1b; and new text end new text begin (2) "net adjusted revenue reduction" means the difference, if any, between: new text end new text begin (i) the amount of revenue the commissioner estimates will be collected from the tax imposed in paragraph (a), for the taxable year for which a rate reduction under paragraph (b) may apply; and new text end new text begin (ii) the amount of revenue the commissioner estimates will be collected from the tax imposed in paragraph (a) using a rate that is determined by reducing the rate in paragraph (a) by 0.312 percent, for the same taxable year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end